Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PILOT PROGRAM TO BUY OUT FLOODED PROPERTIES.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a pilot program to buy out flooded properties and to place deed restrictions on the properties to prohibit commercial, industrial, or residential construction on the properties for 50 years after the date of purchase. Once the deed restriction is placed on a purchased property, nothing in this section prohibits the commissioner from selling or otherwise disposing of the property in accordance with applicable law. new text end